Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-208.06
Registered barber instructor; license; expiration.

The license as a registered barber instructor shall be issued on or before June 30 of each even-numbered year effective as of July 1 of each even-numbered year and shall expire as provided in section 71-216. The license application shall include the applicant's social security number.

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 165;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 55.